Texas statutes.
ELECTION CODE

TITLE 6. CONDUCT OF ELECTIONS

CHAPTER 63. ACCEPTING VOTER

Sec. 63.001. REGULAR PROCEDURE FOR ACCEPTING VOTER. (a) Except as otherwise provided by this code, acceptance of voters shall be conducted as provided by this section and Section 63.0011.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (h), on offering to vote, a voter must present to an election officer at the polling place:

(1) one form of photo identification listed in Section 63.0101(a); or

(2) one form of identification listed in Section 63.0101(b) accompanied by the declaration described by Subsection (i).

(c) On presentation of the documentation required under Subsection (b), an election officer shall determine whether the voter's name on the documentation is on the list of registered voters for the precinct. If in making a determination under this subsection the election officer determines under standards adopted by the secretary of state that the voter's name on the documentation is substantially similar to but does not match exactly with the name on the list, the voter shall be accepted for voting under Subsection (d) if the voter submits an affidavit stating that the voter is the person on the list of registered voters.

(c-1) An election officer may not refuse to accept documentation presented to meet the requirements of Subsection (b) solely because the address on the documentation does not match the address on the list of registered voters.

(d) If, as determined under Subsection (c), the voter's name is on the precinct list of registered voters and the voter's identity can be verified from the documentation presented under Subsection (b), the voter shall be accepted for voting. An election officer may not question the reasonableness of an impediment sworn to by a voter in a declaration described by Subsection (i).

(e) On accepting a voter, an election officer shall indicate beside the voter's name on the list of registered voters that the voter is accepted for voting. If the voter executes a declaration of reasonable impediment to meet the requirement for identification under Subsection (b), the election officer must affix the voter's voter registration number to the declaration either in numeric or bar code form.

(f) After determining whether to accept a voter, an election officer shall return the voter's documentation to the voter.

(g) If the requirements for identification prescribed by Subsection (b) are not met, the voter may be accepted for provisional voting only under Section 63.011. For a voter who is not accepted for voting under this section, an election officer shall:

(1) inform the voter of the voter's right to cast a provisional ballot under Section 63.011; and

(2) provide the voter with written information, in a form prescribed by the secretary of state, that:

(A) lists the requirements for identification;

(B) states the procedure for presenting identification under Section 65.0541;

(C) includes a map showing the location where identification must be presented; and

(D) includes notice that if all procedures are followed and the voter is found to be eligible to vote and is voting in the correct precinct, the voter's provisional ballot will be accepted.

(h) The requirements for identification prescribed by Subsection (b) do not apply to a voter who is disabled and presents the voter's voter registration certificate containing the indication described by Section 15.001(c) on offering to vote.

(i) If the requirement for identification prescribed by Subsection (b)(1) is not met, an election officer shall notify the voter that the voter may be accepted for voting if the voter meets the requirement for identification prescribed by Subsection (b)(2) and executes a declaration declaring the voter has a reasonable impediment to meeting the requirement for identification prescribed by Subsection (b)(1). A person is subject to prosecution for perjury under Chapter 37, Penal Code, or Section 63.0013 for a false statement or false information on the declaration. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the declaration. The form shall include:

(1) a notice that a person is subject to prosecution for perjury under Chapter 37, Penal Code, or Section 63.0013 for a false statement or false information on the declaration;

(2) a statement that the voter swears or affirms that the information contained in the declaration is true, that the person described in the declaration is the same person appearing at the polling place to sign the declaration, and that the voter faces a reasonable impediment to procuring the identification prescribed by Subsection (b)(1);

(3) a place for the voter to indicate one of the following impediments:

(A) lack of transportation;

(B) lack of birth certificate or other documents needed to obtain the identification prescribed by Subsection (b)(1);

(C) work schedule;

(D) lost or stolen identification;

(E) disability or illness;

(F) family responsibilities; and

(G) the identification prescribed by Subsection (b)(1) has been applied for but not received;

(4) a place for the voter to sign and date the declaration;

(5) a place for the election judge to sign and date the declaration;

(6) a place to note the polling place at which the declaration is signed; and

(7) a place for the election judge to note which form of identification prescribed by Subsection (b)(2) the voter presented.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 38, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 54, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 9, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 410 (S.B. 5), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2018.

Sec. 63.0011. STATEMENT OF RESIDENCE REQUIRED. (a) Before a voter may be accepted for voting, an election officer shall ask the voter if the voter's residence address on the precinct list of registered voters is current and whether the voter has changed residence within the county. If the voter's address is omitted from the precinct list under Section 18.005(c), the officer shall ask the voter if the voter's residence, if listed, on identification presented by the voter under Section 63.001(b) is current and whether the voter has changed residence within the county.

(b) If the voter's residence address is not current because the voter has changed residence within the county, the voter may vote, if otherwise eligible, in the election precinct in which the voter is registered if the voter resides in the county in which the voter is registered and, if applicable:

(1) resides in the political subdivision served by the authority ordering the election if the political subdivision is other than the county; or

(2) resides in the territory covered by the election in a less-than-countywide election ordered by the governor or a county authority.

(c) Before being accepted for voting, the voter must execute and submit to an election officer a statement including:

(1) a statement that the voter satisfies the applicable residence requirements prescribed by Subsection (b);

(2) all of the information that a person must include in an application to register to vote under Section 13.002; and

(3) the date the statement is submitted to the election officer.

(c-1) The statement described by Subsection (c) must include a field for the voter to enter the voter's current county of residence.

(d) The voter registrar shall provide to the general custodian of election records a sufficient number of statements of residence for use in each election.

(e) The voter registrar shall retain each statement of residence on file with the voter's voter registration application.

(f) Information included on a statement of residence under Subsection (c)(2) is subject to Section 13.004(c).

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 797, Sec. 39, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 594 (H.B. 41), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 927 (H.B. 3069), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 10, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1178 (S.B. 910), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 41, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 63.0013. FALSE STATEMENT ON DECLARATION OF REASONABLE IMPEDIMENT. (a) A person commits an offense if the person intentionally makes a false statement or provides false information on a declaration executed under Section 63.001(i).

(b) An offense under this section is a state jail felony.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 410 (S.B. 5), Sec. 3, eff. January 1, 2018.

Sec. 63.0015. ACCEPTING VOTERS WITH CERTAIN DISABILITIES. (a) In this section, "mobility problem that substantially impairs a person's ability to ambulate" has the meaning assigned by Section 681.001, Transportation Code.

(b) An election officer shall accept a person with a mobility problem that substantially impairs a person's ability to ambulate who is offering to vote before accepting others offering to vote at the polling place who arrived before the person.

(c) Notice of the priority given to persons with a mobility problem that substantially impairs a person's ability to ambulate shall be posted:

(1) at each entrance to a polling place where it can be read by persons waiting to vote;

(2) on the Internet website of the secretary of state; and

(3) on each Internet website relating to elections maintained by a county.

(d) The notice required by Subsection (c) must read: "Pursuant to Section 63.0015, Election Code, an election officer shall give voting order priority to individuals with a mobility problem that substantially impairs the person's ability to move around. A person assisting an individual with a mobility problem may also, at the individual's request, be given voting order priority. Disabilities and conditions that may qualify you for voting order priority include paralysis, lung disease, the use of portable oxygen, cardiac deficiency, severe limitation in the ability to walk due to arthritic, neurological, or orthopedic condition, wheelchair confinement, arthritis, foot disorder, the inability to walk 200 feet without stopping to rest, or use of a brace, cane, crutch, or other assistive device."

(e) A person assisting a voter in accordance with Section 64.032(c) may be accepted to vote concurrently with a person accepted under Subsection (b) of this section at the voter's request.

(f) All procedures and accommodations available for voters with disabilities, including voting under Section 64.009, shall be posted in an accessible manner on the county clerk's Internet website.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 980 (H.B. 658), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Redesignated from Election Code, Section 63.0013 by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.001(10), eff. September 1, 2019.

Redesignated and amended by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 467 (H.B. 4170), Sec. 21.002(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1066 (S.B. 477), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 63.002. SIGNATURE ROSTER. (a) A signature roster shall be maintained by an election officer at the polling place.

(b) A voter who is accepted for voting must sign the roster before the voter is permitted to vote.

(c) If the voter cannot sign the voter's name, an election officer shall enter the voter's name with a notation of the reason for the voter's inability to sign the roster.

(d) The signature roster may be in the form of an electronic device approved by the secretary of state that is capable of capturing a voter's signature next to the voter's name on the device. The secretary of state shall adopt rules governing the processing of electronic signatures captured under this subsection.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 55, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1000 (H.B. 2373), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 63.003. POLL LIST. (a) A poll list shall be maintained by an election officer at the polling place.

(b) The poll list shall be maintained as an original and two copies.

(c) An election officer shall enter each accepted voter's name on the list after the voter signs the signature roster. The voters' names shall be entered on the poll list in the same order in which they appear on the signature roster.

(d) The poll list may be in the form of an electronic device approved by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall adopt rules governing the use of electronic poll lists.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 916 (H.B. 4130), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 63.004. COMBINATION FORM. (a) The secretary of state may prescribe forms that combine the poll list, the signature roster, or any other form used in connection with the acceptance of voters at polling places with each other or with the list of registered voters. The secretary shall prescribe any special instructions necessary for using the combination forms. The combination forms must include space for an election officer to indicate whether a voter executed a declaration of reasonable impediment under Section 63.001(i).

(b) The authority responsible for procuring the supplies for an election may furnish combination forms for use at the polling places.

(c) If a combination form is used, it shall be maintained in the number of copies specified by this code for the separate form incorporated into it for which the largest number of copies is required.

(d) An authority procuring lists of registered voters for use in an election may not require the voter registrar to furnish the lists in combination form without the registrar's consent. A registrar may not require an authority requesting the lists to accept them in combination form without the authority's consent.

(e) A combination form may be in the form of an electronic device approved by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall adopt rules governing the minimum requirements and approval of an electronic device used for any form used in connection with the acceptance of voters at a polling place.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 410 (S.B. 5), Sec. 4, eff. January 1, 2018.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 916 (H.B. 4130), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 63.005. REGISTRATION OMISSIONS LIST. (a) A registration omissions list shall be maintained by an election officer at the polling place.

(b) With respect to each voter who is accepted for voting but whose name is not on the list of registered voters for the precinct in which the voter is accepted, the election officer shall record:

(1) the voter's name, residence address, and voter registration number, if known; and

(2) a notation of the section of this code under which the voter is accepted that provides for accepting voters who are not on the list.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 42, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 63.0051. CONFIRMING REGISTRATION STATUS OF VOTER. (a) If the name of a voter who is offering to vote is not on the precinct list of registered voters, an election officer may contact the voter registrar regarding the voter's registration status.

(b) If the election officer determines the voter is a registered voter of the territory covered by the election but is offering to vote in the incorrect precinct, the election officer shall provide the correct precinct location information to the voter.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 63.009, a voter shall be accepted for voting if the voter's identity has been verified from documentation as required by Section 63.001(b) and it can be determined from the voter registrar that:

(1) the voter's registration was improperly canceled and has been reinstated under Section 16.037;

(2) an error in the voter registration record caused the voter's name to not appear on the list of registered voters, and the error has been corrected under Section 15.022; or

(3) the voter's name has been inadvertently left off the list of registered voters for the precinct.

(d) After the voter is accepted under Subsection (c), an election officer shall enter the voter's name on the registration omissions list.

(e) The voter shall be accepted for provisional voting under Section 63.011 if the election officer cannot determine that the voter is a registered voter of the territory covered by the election in which the voter is offering to vote.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 711 (H.B. 3107), Sec. 42, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 63.006. VOTER WITH REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION WHO IS NOT ON LIST. (a) A voter who, when offering to vote, presents the documentation required under Section 63.001(b) but whose name is not on the precinct list of registered voters shall be accepted for voting if the voter also presents a voter registration certificate indicating that the voter is currently registered:

(1) in the precinct in which the voter is offering to vote; or

(2) in a different precinct in the same county as the precinct in which the voter is offering to vote and the voter executes an affidavit stating that the voter:

(A) is a resident of the precinct in which the voter is offering to vote or is otherwise entitled by law to vote in that precinct;

(B) was a resident of the precinct in which the voter is offering to vote at the time the information on the voter's residence address was last provided to the voter registrar;

(C) did not deliberately provide false information to secure registration in a precinct in which the voter does not reside; and

(D) is voting only once in the election.

(b) After the voter is accepted, an election officer shall:

(1) indicate beside the voter's name on the poll list that the voter was accepted under this section; and

(2) enter the voter's name on the registration omissions list.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 864, Sec. 57, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 12, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 63.009. VOTER WITHOUT CERTIFICATE WHO IS NOT ON LIST. A voter who does not present a voter registration certificate when offering to vote, and whose name is not on the list of registered voters for the precinct in which the voter is offering to vote, shall be accepted for provisional voting if the voter executes an affidavit in accordance with Section 63.011.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan, 1986. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 728, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1078, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 28, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 26, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 13, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 63.0101. DOCUMENTATION OF PROOF OF IDENTIFICATION. (a) The following documentation is an acceptable form of photo identification under this chapter:

(1) a driver's license, election identification certificate, or personal identification card issued to the person by the Department of Public Safety that has not expired or that expired no earlier than four years before the date of presentation;

(2) a United States military identification card that contains the person's photograph that has not expired or that expired no earlier than four years before the date of presentation;

(3) a United States citizenship certificate issued to the person that contains the person's photograph;

(4) a United States passport book or card issued to the person that has not expired or that expired no earlier than four years before the date of presentation; or

(5) a license to carry a handgun issued to the person by the Department of Public Safety that has not expired or that expired no earlier than four years before the date of presentation.

(b) The following documentation is acceptable as proof of identification under this chapter:

(1) a government document that shows the name and address of the voter, including the voter's voter registration certificate;

(2) one of the following documents that shows the name and address of the voter:

(A) a copy of a current utility bill;

(B) a bank statement;

(C) a government check; or

(D) a paycheck; or

(3) a certified copy of a domestic birth certificate or other document confirming birth that is admissible in a court of law and establishes the person's identity.

(c) A person 70 years of age or older may use a form of identification listed in Subsection (a) that has expired for the purposes of voting if the identification is otherwise valid.

(d) Pursuant to Section 63.001(c), proof of identification is presented only for the purpose of identifying a voter and not for verification of residence.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1078, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1349, Sec. 30, eff. Sept. 1, 1997. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 27, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 14, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 9, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 410 (S.B. 5), Sec. 5, eff. January 1, 2018.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1023 (H.B. 368), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 63.0102. USE OF CERTAIN ELECTRONICALLY READABLE INFORMATION. (a) An election officer may access electronically readable information on a driver's license or personal identification card for proof of identification when determining whether a voter shall be accepted for voting.

(b) The secretary of state shall prescribe any necessary procedures to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1189 (H.B. 178), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 63.011. PROVISIONAL VOTING. (a) A person to whom Section 63.001(g) or 63.009 applies may cast a provisional ballot if the person executes an affidavit stating that the person:

(1) is a registered voter in the precinct in which the person seeks to vote; and

(2) is eligible to vote in the election.

(a-1) A person to whom the early voting clerk was required to provide an early voting ballot by mail under Section 86.001 and who did not vote early by mail may cast a provisional ballot on election day if the person executes an affidavit stating that the person:

(1) is a registered voter in the precinct in which the person seeks to vote; and

(2) did not vote early by mail.

(b) A form for an affidavit required by this section must be printed on an envelope in which the provisional ballot voted by the person may be placed and must include:

(1) a space for entering the identification number of the provisional ballot voted by the person; and

(2) a space for an election officer to indicate whether the person presented a form of identification described by Section 63.0101.

(b-1) The affidavit form may include space for disclosure of any necessary information to enable the person to register to vote under Chapter 13. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the affidavit under this section.

(c) After executing the affidavit, the person shall be given a provisional ballot for the election. An election officer shall record the number of the ballot on the space provided on the affidavit.

(d) An election officer shall enter "provisional vote" on the poll list beside the name of each voter who is accepted for voting under this section.

(e) A person who is permitted under a state or federal court order to cast a ballot in an election for a federal office after the time allowed by Subchapter B, Chapter 41, must cast the ballot as a provisional vote in the manner required by this section.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 28, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1078 (H.B. 2823), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 123 (S.B. 14), Sec. 15, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1002 (H.B. 2194), Sec. 9, eff. January 1, 2012.

Sec. 63.0111. OFFENSES RELATED TO PROVISIONAL VOTING. (a) An election judge commits an offense if the judge knowingly provides a voter with a form for an affidavit required by Section 63.001 if the form contains information that the judge entered on the form knowing it was false.

(b) An offense under this section is a state jail felony.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 1), Sec. 7.01, eff. December 2, 2021.

Sec. 63.012. UNLAWFULLY ACCEPTING OR REFUSING TO ACCEPT VOTER. (a) An election officer commits an offense if the officer knowingly:

(1) permits an ineligible voter to vote other than as provided by Section 63.011; or

(2) refuses to accept a person for voting whose acceptance is required by this code.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 211, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1986. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1315, Sec. 29, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 410 (S.B. 5), Sec. 6, eff. January 1, 2018.